lexicon/apertium-krc.Seegmiller-Cyrl.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%> 

%{ь%}
%{ъ%}
%{☭%}
%{Ь%}
%{Ъ%}
%{щ%}
%{ц%}

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 
Punct ; 
Exceptions ;
Initial ;
Digits ;

LEXICON ExceptionLoop 

Alpha ;
 # ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
Exceptions ;
%- Alpha ; 
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

a:a AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
â:â AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
b:b AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ç:ç AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
č:ç AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
d:d AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
e:e AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
f:f AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
!g:g AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
h:h AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
i:i AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ı:ı AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ï:ı AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
İ:İ AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
I:I AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ï:I AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
j:j AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
!k:k AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
l:l AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
m:m AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
n:n AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
o:o AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ö:ö AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
p:p AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
r:r AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
s:s AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ş:ş AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
š:ş AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
t:t AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
u:u AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ü:ü AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
v:v AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
w:w AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
x:x AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
y:y AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;        ! no йь in crh; e.g кой for köy
z:z AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;

c:dj AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ǰ:dj AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ñ:ng AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
ŋ:ng AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
q:k%{ъ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
k:k%{ъ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
ğ:g%{ъ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
g:g%{ъ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;

şç:%{щ%} AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;   ! should be same weight as шч?
şç:şç    AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;   ! should be same weight as шч?
ts:%{ц%} AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;   !
ts:ts    AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;   !

!ü:yu AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;

P:P AlphaLoop "weight: 1.1" ;
!Y:Y AlphaLoop "weight: 1.1" ;

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 

LEXICON Exception

:%{☭%} ExceptionLoop "weight: 0.1" ; 

LEXICON Exceptions 

tsiya:%{ц%}iya Exception "weight: 0.1" ;   !
tsiz:tsiz Exception "weight: 0.1" ;   !
tsız:tsız Exception "weight: 0.1" ;   !
obye:ob%{Ъ%}ye Exception "weight: 0.1";
subye:sub%{Ъ%}ye Exception "weight: 0.1";
yabr:yabr%{Ь%} # "weight: 0.1";
âbr:yabr%{Ь%} # "weight: 0.1";

LEXICON Initial

ts:%{ц%} AlphaLoop "weight: 0.1" ;   !

!@!! words with misc y or ь issues
!@!söz:syoz Exception "weight: 0.1" ;
!@!dünya:dün%{Ь%}ya Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!bugün:bugun%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!özgün:ozgun%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!baar:baar%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!baryer:bar%{Ь%}er Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!asfalt:asfal%{Ь%}t Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!palto:pal%{Ь%}to Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!pavilyon:pavil%{Ь%}on Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!peçenye:peçen%{Ь%}e Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!perepis:perepis%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!plüralizm:plyuralizm Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!plüs:plus%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!podyezd:pod%{Ь%}ezd Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!porşen:porşen%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!povest:povest%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!qalp:q%{ъ%}al%{Ь%}p Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!pyesa:p%{Ь%}esa Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!hulya:hul%{Ь%}ya Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!ilk:i%{Ь%}lk Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!isyan:is%{ь%}yan Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!küç:küç%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!
!@!!some common word beginnings
!@!ulti:ul%{Ь%}ti Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!ultra:ul%{Ь%}tra Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!urm:ur%{Ь%}m Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!urk:ur%{Ь%}k Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!url:ur%{Ь%}l Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!
!@!!some words that end in ль
!@!aerozol:aerozol%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!aktual:aktual%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!alkogol:alkogol%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!ansambl:ansambl%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!arzual:arzual%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!detal:detal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!diagonal:diagonal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!düldül:düldül%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!embrional:embrional%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!faal:faal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!fenomenal:fenomenal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!fevral:fevral%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!formal:formal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!frontal:frontal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!ikmal:ikmal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!işğal:işğ%{ъ%}al%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!istiqbal:istiq%{ъ%}bal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!istiqlâl:istiq%{ъ%}lâl%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!ital:i%{Ъ%}tal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!Kastropol:Kastropol%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!kinofestival:kinofestival%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!kommunal:kommunal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!kontinental:kontinental%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!magistral:magistral%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!maqbul:maq%{ъ%}bul%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!meal:meal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!mecul:medjul%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!medal:medal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!meşal:meş%{Ъ%}al%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!meşğul:meşğ%{ъ%}ul%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!mineral:mineral%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!misal:misal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!müçel:müçel%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!mükemmel:mükemmel%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!mütezil:mütezil%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!neytral:neytral%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!normal:normal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!optimal:optimal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!ornamental:ornamental%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!parol:parol%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!patrul:patrul%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!pedal:pedal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!ratsional:ratsional%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!real:real%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!regional:regional%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!şimal:şimal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!spiral:spiral%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!sual:sual%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!territorial:territorial%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!timsal:timsal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!total:total%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!tütkel:tütkel%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!universal:universal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!vertikal:vertikal%{Ь%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!mülk:mül%{Ь%}k Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!plüs:plyus Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!
!@!! Some words that have hard signs
!@!alyanaq:al%{Ъ%}yanaq%{ъ%} Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!demiryol:demir%{Ъ%}yol Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!deral:der%{Ъ%}al Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!havyar:hav%{Ъ%}yar Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!italât:it%{Ъ%}alât Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!küleryüz:küler%{Ъ%}yüz Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!mefum:me%{Ъ%}fum Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!meşalci:meş%{Ъ%}aldji Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!obyekt:ob%{Ъ%}yekt Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!subyekt:sub%{Ъ%}yekt Exception "weight: 0.1";
!@!yamyam:yam%{Ъ%}yam Exception "weight: 0.1";
